Hawaii, session 2025, SB756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's natural resources are among the State's most precious assets.  These resources are vital to the strength of Hawaii's environment, economy, and cultural heritage.  Effective conservation enforcement is critical to safeguard these resources from unlawful exploitation and degradation. The legislature further finds that the department of land and natural resources' DLNRTip application provides an important mechanism for citizens to report natural resource violations directly to the department of land and natural resources. However, the legislature also finds that the application has faced challenges due to inconsistent monitoring, which has led to delayed or no responses, the loss of critical evidence, and a decline in public trust.  These shortcomings have hindered the application's ability to function as an effective enforcement tool. The legislature recognizes the increasing demand for citizen involvement in conservation enforcement.  Given the extensive scope of natural resource protection and the limitations of available enforcement personnel, citizen reporting is essential for bridging enforcement gaps. To address these issues, this Act codifies the DLNRTip application into the Hawaii Revised Statutes and provides critical resources to increase the application's effectiveness.  This change will help to ensure that the department of land and natural resources properly monitors the application and responds to reports in a timely fashion. The resources provided by this Act will also help to enhance the application's capabilities, establish dedicated staffing, and mandate comprehensive reporting to the legislature on the application's use and effectiveness. The legislature believes that this Act will restore public confidence in the DLNRTip application and maximize the application's potential as a tool to protect Hawaii's natural resources. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish the DLNRTip application as the official electronic platform for persons to report natural resource violations to the division of conservation and resources enforcement; (2)  Establish statutory requirements regarding the design and maintenance of the DLNRTip application; (3)  Require the department of land and natural resources to ensure that all information submitted through the DLNRTip application is continuously monitored to facilitate timely enforcement responses; (4)  Require annual reports to the legislature on the use and effectiveness of the DLNRTip application; and (5)  Appropriate moneys to implement and maintain the DLNRTip application and to establish one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position to support the operation of the DLNRTip application. SECTION 2. Chapter 199, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    . DLNRTip Application §199-A Definitions.  As used in this part: "Department" means the department of land and natural resources. "Division" means the division of conservation and resources enforcement. "DLNRTip application" means the mobile application developed by or for the department of land and natural resources pursuant to section 199-B. "Natural resource violations" includes: (1)  The poaching or harassment of protected wildlife species; (2)  Pollution; and (3)  Any other activity prohibited by law or rule that impacts the State's land, water, flora, fauna, or other natural resources. "Report" means text, photographs, videos, or other evidence submitted to the department through the DLNRTip application. §199-B DLNRTip application; natural resource violation reports; designation as official platform.  (a)  The DLNRTip application is established as the official electronic platform for persons to report natural resource violations to the division. (b) The department shall design and maintain the DLNRTip application to allow persons to submit text, photographs, videos, and other evidence to the division for the purpose of providing timely and actionable information regarding potential natural resource violations. (c) The department shall design the DLNRTip application to allow a person to report information to the division anonymously. §199-C DLNRTip application; management and oversight.  (a) The division shall manage and oversee the operation of the DLNRTip application. (b) The division shall ensure that information provided through the DLNRTip application is continuously monitored by qualified personnel to facilitate timely response by the division. (c) The department shall adopt policies and procedures to address the: (1)  Processing of text, photographs, videos, and other evidence submitted through the DLNRTip application; and (2)  Use of information submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) to initiate timely enforcement actions. §199-D DLNRTip application; annual reports. (a)  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, the department shall submit a report to the legislature detailing the use and effectiveness of the DLNRTip application. (b) The report shall include: (1)  The total number of reports received through the DLNRTip application during the preceding year; (2)  The number of reports that resulted in enforcement actions; (3)  The average response time between the submission of a report and the resulting enforcement action; and (4)  Any other findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation." SECTION 3. Chapter 199, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by designating sections 199-1 to 199-9 as part I, entitled "General Provisions". SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $150,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  The implementation and maintenance of the DLNRTip application; and (2)  The establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position within the department of land and natural resources to: (A)  Support the operation of the DLNRTip application; (B)  Monitor incoming reports submitted using the DLNRTip application; (C)  Coordinate with enforcement personnel to ensure appropriate and timely responses to reports submitted using the DLNRTip application; and (D)  Maintain records of all reports received using the DLNRTip application and any associated response actions made in response to those reports. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 6. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________